Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB716.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6882YC (3) 91 je/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 261M.1 Short title. 1 This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the âFirst 2 Responder Dependent Education Actâ . 3 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 261M.2 Definitions. 4 1. âAssociate degree programâ means a degree program offered 5 by a community college that requires completion of at least 6 sixty semester credit hours or an equivalent program of study. 7 âAssociate degree programâ does not include a baccalaureate 8 degree program. 9 2. âDependentâ means a child of a first responder who is 10 claimed as a dependent for state or federal tax purposes for 11 the most recent tax year. 12 3. âEmergency medical care providerâ means an individual 13 certified pursuant to section 147A.6. 14 4. âFire fighterâ means a paid or volunteer member of a fire 15 department who is certified under section 100B.6. 16 5. âFirst responderâ means a law enforcement officer, fire 17 fighter, or emergency medical care provider. 18 6. âLaw enforcement officerâ means a person who is 19 responsible for the prevention or detection of crime or the 20 enforcement of the criminal, traffic, or highway laws of this 21 state or any political subdivision of this state for more than 22 one hundred hours per year, and who is authorized by law to 23 make arrests. 24 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 261M.3 Eligibility for tuition waiver. 25 A community college shall grant a dependent of a first 26 responder a waiver of resident tuition if the dependent does 27 all of the following: 28 1. Meets all admission requirements of the community 29 college. 30 2. Enrolls in the community college and pursues studies 31 leading to any of the following: 32 a. An associate degree related to a career in public safety 33 or emergency response. 34 b. A degree or credential in a high-demand job as determined 35 -1- LSB 6882YC (3) 91 je/ns 1/ 4 H.F. _____ by the workforce development board pursuant to section 84A.1B, 1 subsection 3. 2 3. Submits verification that the dependentâs parent or 3 legal guardian is an active first responder in Iowa at the 4 time of the dependentâs initial application for a waiver. 5 Verification must include a certificate of satisfactory 6 performance from the first responderâs supervisor within the 7 employing agency. 8 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 261M.4 Waiver amount and duration. 9 1. The amount of a waiver under this chapter shall be the 10 amount of the dependentâs resident tuition remaining after 11 subtracting all of the following received by the dependent: 12 a. Any federal grants. 13 b. Any state scholarships and grants. 14 c. Any awards from the future ready Iowa skilled workforce 15 last-dollar scholarship program under section 256.228. 16 2. An eligible dependent may receive the tuition waiver 17 for no more than two academic years, provided the dependent 18 continues to meet the requirements of this chapter and all 19 policies of the community college on continued enrollment and 20 progress toward completion of the applicable degree or program. 21 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 261M.5 In-state residency requirement. 22 1. As a condition of receiving a tuition waiver under this 23 chapter, a dependent shall remain a resident of the state 24 of Iowa for a period of not less than five years following 25 completion of the degree or program for which the waiver was 26 received. 27 2. A dependent who voluntarily relocates outside the state 28 before completing the required five-year period shall repay to 29 the community college the prorated amount of tuition waived on 30 the dependentâs behalf. The community college shall determine 31 the prorated repayment amount based on the portion of the 32 five-year residency obligation not completed. 33 3. Repayment under this section shall not be required if the 34 dependentâs relocation is due to death, permanent disability, 35 -2- LSB 6882YC (3) 91 je/ns 2/ 4 H.F. _____ or other good cause as determined by the community college. 1 4. If a first responder dies in the line of duty after the 2 dependentâs initial application for a waiver is submitted, the 3 dependent shall remain eligible for the tuition waiver and 4 shall not be subject to subsection 1. 5 5. A community college shall adopt procedures for 6 monitoring compliance with this section and for administering 7 repayment obligations. 8 Sec. 6. IMPLEMENTATION OF ACT. Section 25B.2, subsection 9 3, shall not apply to this Act. 10